Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
2. JURISDICTION

Note

Article heading reenacted by L 2015, c 77, pt of §1.

Parts I, II, and III headings in this Article deleted by L
2015, c 77, pt of §1.

§576B-201 Bases for jurisdiction over
nonresident. (a) In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order
or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal of this State may exercise
personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual or the individual's
guardian or conservator if:

(1) The individual is personally served with summons
or notice within this State;

(2) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of
this State by consent in a record, by entering a general appearance, or by
filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to
personal jurisdiction;

(3) The individual resided with the child in this
State;

(4) The individual resided in this State and provided
prenatal expenses or support for the child;

(5) The child resides in this State as a result of
the acts or directives of the individual;

(6) The individual engaged in sexual intercourse in
this State and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse;

(7) The individual asserted parentage of the child in
the office of health status monitoring maintained in this State by the department
of health; or

(8) There is any other basis consistent with the
constitutions of this State and the United States for the exercise of personal
jurisdiction.

(b) The bases of personal jurisdiction set
forth in subsection (a) or in any other law of this State may not be used to
acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of this State to modify a child
support order of another state unless the requirements of section 576B-611 are
met, or in the case of a foreign support order, unless the requirements of
section 576B‑615 are met. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt
of §1]

Case Notes

Where family court had neither general nor specific
jurisdiction over father, court erred in entering default judgment against
father in mother's child support action. 110 H. 294 (App.), 132 P.3d 862
(2006).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next